South Dakota, session 2026, SB90.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 34-20G-88.1 be AMENDED:
34-20G-88.1. For each cardholder and nonresident cardholder, the department
shall submit to the prescription drug monitoring program, authorized pursuant to chapter
34-20E, the cardholder's:
(1) Name;
(2) Physical address, except that if the applicant is homeless, no address is required;
(3) Date of birth; and
(4) Registry identification card number.

26.323.14 2 90
An Act to expand the information required to be sent to the prescription drug monitoring
program for each registry identification card holder.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 90
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 90 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB90 ENROLLED